test/src/morphology/N-ooqbil_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ǭʼbiļ: # Noun 242 'eng /est ristik/fin' - full paradigm
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Sg+Nom: ǭʼbiļ
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Sg+Gen: ǭʼbiļ
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Sg+Par: ǭʼbiļt
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Sg+Dat: ǭʼbiļõn
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Sg+Ins: ǭʼbiļõks
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Sg+Ill: ǭʼbiļõ
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Sg+Ela: ǭʼbiļšt
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Pl+Nom: ǭʼbiļd
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Pl+Gen: ǭʼbiļd
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Pl+Par: ǭʼbiļi
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Pl+Dat: ǭʼbiļdõn
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Pl+Ins: ǭʼbiļdõks
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Pl+Ill: ǭʼbiļiž
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Pl+Ela: ǭʼbiļist
